Maryland, session 2025, SB0374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–861.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROFESSIONAL FIREFIGHTER” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED AS A FIREFIGHTER BY A STATE, COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL
ENTITY DURING THE TIME OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S EMPLOYMENT.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE TO A
PROFESSIONAL FIREFIGHTER FOR PREVENTIVE CANCER SCREENINGS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE LATEST SCREENING GUIDELINES ISSUED BY THE
INTERNATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF FIRE FIGHTERS.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE A COPAYMENT,
COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT ON COVERAGE OF PREVENTIVE
CANCER SCREENINGS FOR PROFESSIONAL FIREFIGHTERS AS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF AN INSURED OR AN ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN, AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 223, AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY SUBJECT PREVENTIVE CANCER SCREENINGS FOR
PROFESSIONAL FIREFIGHTERS TO THE DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT OF THE
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 656
(E) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION FROM PROVIDING COVERAGES THAT ARE GREATER THAN
OR MORE FAVORABLE TO AN INSURED OR AN ENROLLEE THAN THE COVERAGE
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
Article – Local Government
1–207. 9–114.
(A) (1) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A COUNTY THAT OFFERS A SELF–INSURED
EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN IN THE STATE SHALL ENSURE THAT THE PLAN
COMPLIES WITH § 15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE PROVIDE TO EACH
FIREFIGHTER EMPLOYED BY THE COUNTY COVERAGE FOR PREVENTIVE CANCER
SCREENINGS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LATEST SCREENING GUIDELINES ISSUED
BY THE INTERNATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF FIRE FIGHTERS.
(2) A COUNTY SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY
NOT IMPOSE A COPAYMENT, COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT ON
COVERAGE OF PREVENTIVE CANCER SCREENINGS FOR FIREFIGHTERS AS REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) A COUNTY MAY SATISFY THE REQUIREMENT IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION BY:
(1) PROVIDING A NO–COST ANNUAL EXAMINATION TO FIREFIGHTERS
EMPLOYED BY THE COUNTY THAT INCLUDES PREVENTIVE CANCER SCREENINGS
FOR FIREFIGHTERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LATEST SCREENING GUIDELINES
ISSUED BY THE INTERNATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF FIRE FIGHTERS; OR
(2) APPLYING FOR A GRANT UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 40 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE TO PAY FOR INNOVATIVE CANCER SCREENING
TECHNOLOGIES, INCLUDING A MULTICANCER EARLY DETECTION BLOOD TEST.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A COUNTY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION FROM PROVIDING COVERAGES THAT ARE GREATER THAN
OR MORE FAVORABLE TO AN INSURED OR AN ENROLLEE THAN THE COVERAGE
REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
2–502.
– 3 –

Ch. 656 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) There is a State Employee and Retiree Health and Welfare Benefits Program,
to be developed and administered by the Secretary.
(b) (1) The Program:
(i) subject to the regulations adopted under § 2–503 of this subtitle,
shall encompass all units in the Executive, Judicial, and Legislative branches of State
government, including any unit with an independent personnel system;
(ii) shall include the health insurance benefit options established by
the Secretary; and
(iii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, may
include any other benefit option that the Secretary considers appropriate.
2–503.
(a) The Secretary shall:
(1) adopt regulations for the administration of the Program;
(2) ensure that the Program complies with:
(i) all federal and State laws governing employee benefit plans;
[and]
(ii) §§ 15–826, 15–826.1, 15–826.2, and, as applicable to
contraceptive drugs and devices, 15–831(a) through (d) of the Insurance Article; AND
(III) § 15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE;
(3) each year, recommend to the Governor the State share of the costs of
the Program; and
(4) make ongoing eligibility determinations to ensure that participation in
the Program does not impede, undermine, or conflict with federal compliance obligations or
government and cafeteria plan status.
(b) (1) The Secretary may arrange as the Secretary considers appropriate any
benefit option for inclusion in the Program.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 656
(a) Each county subject to § 9–114 of the Local Government Article, as enacted by
Section 1 of this Act, shall collect for calendar years 2026 and 2027 the following data:
(1) the number of firefighters eligible for the coverage required under §
9–114 of the Local Government Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act;
(2) the number of firefighters provided preventive cancer screenings;
(3) the number of preventive cancer screenings that resulted in a cancer
diagnosis; and
(4) the cost to provide preventive cancer screenings, including:
(i) the average cost of providing preventive cancer screenings to a
firefighter; and
(ii) the total cost for providing preventive cancer screenings to
firefighters.
(b) On or before June 1, 2027, and June 1, 2028, each county subject to § 9–114 of
the Local Government Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall report to the
Maryland Health Care Commission the data collected under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) (1) The Maryland Health Care Commission shall:
(i) study the impact of expanding the preventive cancer screenings
coverage required under § 9–114 of the Local Government Article, as enacted by Section 1
of this Act, to the commercial insurance market; and
(ii) on or before December 1, 2028, report the results of the study to
the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(2) In completing the study required under paragraph (1)(i) of this
subsection, the Maryland Health Care Commission shall consider the data reported under
subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –